Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1208.02
Natural resources ground water technician, defined.

Natural resources ground water technician means any individual employed by a natural resources district and engaged in the inspection of chemigation systems, measuring and recording static water levels, inspection and servicing of flow meters, and water sampling practices and techniques. Natural resources ground water technician does not include: (1) An individual who constructs a water well or installs or repairs pumps or pumping equipment or a water well; (2) a water well monitoring technician; or (3) an individual who carries out the measurement, sampling, or inspection of a water well which is on land owned by him or her and used by him or her for farming, ranching, or agricultural purposes or as his or her place of abode.

Laws 2001, LB 133, § 5.